da: Påføringsværktøj til spinderoksolie: Børsteapplikator; Pipetteflaske; Nålesmørespids; Præcisionstud; Roll-on-applikator; Spray; Standardflaskeåbning; Andet
nl: Applicator spinolie: Kwastapplicator; Druppelflesje; Naaldsmeerpunt; Precisietuit; Roll-on-applicator; Spray; Standaard flesopening; Overige
vi: Dụng cụ tra dầu kéo sợi: Đầu cọ; Chai nhỏ giọt; Đầu tra dầu dạng kim; Đầu rót chính xác; Đầu lăn; Dạng xịt; Miệng chai tiêu chuẩn; Khác
ro-RO: Instrument de aplicare a uleiului de filare: Aplicator cu perie; Sticlă cu picurător; Vârf de ungere cu ac; Duză de precizie; Aplicator roll-on; Spray; Deschidere standard a sticlei; Altele
fr: Outil d'application d'huile à rotation: Applicateur à pinceau; Flacon compte-gouttes; Embout graisseur à aiguille; Bec de précision; Applicateur à bille; Vaporisateur; Ouverture de flacon standard; Autre
zh-CN: 纺纱油涂抹工具: 刷涂器; 滴瓶; 针形注油嘴; 精密注油口; 走珠涂抹器; 喷雾; 标准瓶口; 其他
sk-SK: Nástroj na nanášanie pradiarenského oleja: Štetcový aplikátor; Fľaštička s kvapkadlom; Ihlový hrot na olej; Presný lievik; Guľôčkový aplikátor; Sprej; Štandardný otvor fľaše; Iný
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับหยอดน้ำมันหล่อลื่นแบบหมุน: หัวแปรง; ขวดหยด; ปลายหัวหยอดน้ำมันแบบเข็ม; หัวฉีดแบบแม่นยำ; หัวลูกกลิ้ง; สเปรย์; ปากขวดมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
cs: Nástroj pro nanášení oleje při spřádání: Štětcový aplikátor; Lahvička s kapátkem; Hrot s jehlou pro olejování; Přesná hubice; Kuličkový aplikátor; Sprej; Standardní hrdlo lahvičky; Jiné
hr-HR: Alat za nanošenje ulja pri predenju: Aplikator u obliku četkice; Bočica s kapaljkom; Vrh u obliku igle za podmazivanje; Precizni kljun; Roll-on aplikator; Sprej; Standardni otvor bočice; Ostalo
hu: Fonóolaj felviteli eszköz: Ecsetes applikátor; Cseppentős üveg; Tűs olajozóhegy; Precíziós csőr; Golyós applikátor; Spray; Normál üvegnyílás; Egyéb
pt-BR: Ferramenta de aplicação de óleo na rotação: Pincel aplicador; Frasco conta-gotas; Ponta agulha para lubrificação; Bico de precisão; Aplicador roll-on; Spray; Abertura de frasco padrão; Outros
ru: Инструмент нанесения масла при прядении: Аппликатор-кисть; Флакон-капельница; Игольчатый наконечник масленки; Прецизионный носик; Роликовый аппликатор; Спрей; Стандартное горлышко флакона; Другое
sl-SI: Orodje za nanašanje olja za predenje: Aplikator s čopičem; Steklenička s kapalko; Konica za natančno mazanje z iglo; Natančen nastavek; Roll-on aplikator; Razpršilo; Standardna odprtina stekleničke; Drugo
tr: Çıkrık yağı uygulama aracı: Fırça aplikatör; Damlalıklı şişe; İğneli yağlayıcı uç; Hassas uç; Roll-on aplikatör; Sprey; Standart şişe ağzı; Diğer
ja: スピニングオイル適用ツール: ブラシアプリケーター; スポイトボトル; ニードルオイラーチップ; プレシジョンスパウト; ロールオンアプリケーター; スプレー; 標準ボトル開口部; その他
es: Herramienta de aplicación de aceite para hilado: Aplicador de brocha; Frasco gotero; Punta engrasadora de aguja; Boquilla de precisión; Aplicador roll-on; Spray; Apertura de botella estándar; Otro
fi: Pyörivän pyörän öljyn levitystyökalu: Sivellinlevitin; Tippapullo; Neulaöljyäjän kärki; Tarkkuusnokka; Roll-on-levitin; Suihke; Vakiopullonsuu; Muu
el: Εργαλείο εφαρμογής λαδιού για περιστροφή: Απλικατέρ με πινέλο; Μπουκάλι με σταγονόμετρο; Μύτη λίπανσης με βελόνα; Στόμιο ακριβείας; Απλικατέρ roll-on; Σπρέι; Κανονικό άνοιγμα μπουκαλιού; Άλλο
de: Applikationsart des Spinnöls: Pinselapplikator; Tropfflasche; Nadelöler-Spitze; Präzisionsausgießer; Roll-on-Applikator; Spray; Standard-Flaschenöffnung; Sonstige
it: Strumento di applicazione dell'olio da spinning: Applicatore a pennello; Flacone contagocce; Punta oliatore ad ago; Beccuccio di precisione; Applicatore roll-on; Spray; Apertura standard del flacone; Altro
pt-PT: Ferramenta de aplicação de óleo para rodas giratórias: Aplicador de pincel; Frasco conta-gotas; Ponta de lubrificador de agulha; Bico de precisão; Aplicador roll-on; Spray; Abertura de frasco padrão; Outro
bg-BG: Инструмент за нанасяне на масло за предене: Апликатор тип четка; Бутилка с капкомер; Накрайник тип игла за смазване; Прецизен чучур; Рол-он апликатор; Спрей; Стандартен отвор на бутилка; Друго
pl: Narzędzie do aplikacji oleju przędzalniczego: Aplikator pędzelkowy; Butelka z zakraplaczem; Olejarka igłowa; Precyzyjny dzióbek; Aplikator w kulce; Spray; Standardowy otwór butelki; Inne
ko: 방적유 도포 도구: 브러시 어플리케이터; 스포이트 병; 바늘 주유기 팁; 정밀 스파우트; 롤온 어플리케이터; 스프레이; 표준 병 입구; 기타
nb: Applikasjonsverktøy for olje til spinning: Penselapplikator; Dråpeflaske; Nålespiss for olje; Presisjonstut; Roll-on-applikator; Spray; Standard flaskeåpning; Annet
zh-TW: 紡紗油塗抹工具: 刷塗器; 滴瓶; 針頭注油尖端; 精準注油嘴; 滾珠塗抹器; 噴霧; 標準瓶口; 其他
lt-LT: Verpimo alyvos naudojimo įrankis: Šepetėlinis aplikatorius; Buteliukas su lašintuvu; Adatinis tepalo antgalis; Tikslus snapelis; Rutulinis aplikatorius; Purškiklis; Standartinis buteliuko kakliukas; Kita
en: Spinning oil application tool: Brush applicator; Dropper bottle; Needle oiler tip; Precision spout; Roll-on applicator; Spray; Standard bottle opening; Other
sv: Verktyg för applicering av spinnolja: Borstapplikator; Pipettflaska; Nålspets; Precisionspip; Roll-on-applikator; Spray; Standard flasköppning; Annat